Washington statutes.
RCW 14.12.210

Enforcement and remedies.

Each violation of this chapter or of any regulations, orders, or rulings promulgated or made pursuant to this chapter, shall constitute a misdemeanor, and each day a violation continues to exist shall constitute a separate offense. In addition, the political subdivision or agency adopting zoning regulations under this chapter may institute in any court of competent jurisdiction, an action to prevent, restrain, correct or abate any violation of this chapter, or of airport zoning regulations adopted under this chapter, or of any order or ruling made in connection with their administration or enforcement, and the court shall adjudge to the plaintiff such relief, by way of injunction (which may be mandatory) or otherwise, as may be proper under all the facts and circumstances of the case, in order fully to effectuate the purposes of this chapter and of the regulations adopted and orders and rulings made pursuant thereto.

[ 1945 c 174 s 12; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2722-26.]